Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are  appropriated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Administration...................... $ 21,883,931
(2) Preparedness and Response .. $ 5,326,001
(3) Mitigation and Recovery ....... $ 300,833
(4) Debt Service.......................... $ 5,765,853
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management, for the following purposes:
(1) Administration...................... $ 455,173
(2) 9-1-1 Emergency Program ..... $ 149,545,258
(3) Preparedness and Response .. $ 7,811,957
(4) Statewide Interoperability
Program ................................ $ 3,869,857
(5) Mitigation and Recovery ....... $  24,525,466
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from  federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Department of Emer-
gency Management, for the following purposes:
(1) Administration...................... $ 669,894
(2) Preparedness and Response .. $ 63,025,681
(3) Mitigation and Recovery ....... $ 1,034,862,740
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5517 (SB 5517-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5517 (SB 5517-A) Page 2